Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1230
License; sale, transfer, or assignment; prohibited.

A license issued under the Emergency Medical Services Practice Act shall not be sold, transferred, or assigned by the holder. Any change of ownership of an emergency medical service requires a new application and a new license.

Laws 1997, LB 138, § 19;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-5190;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 514.